Colorado, session 2026A, SB162.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 12-30-126 as
follows:
12-30-126. Sensitive test results protection act - prohibition
against early release - exception - short title - legislative declaration
- definitions.
(1) Short title. THE SHORT TITLE OF THIS SECTION IS THE
"SENSITIVE TEST RESULTS PROTECTION ACT".
(2) Legislative declaration.
(a) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS THAT:
(I) THE FEDERAL "21ST CENTURY CURES ACT", PUB.L. 114-255,
130 STAT. 1033, ESTABLISHES STANDARDS AND REQUIREMENTS FOR
PROVIDING PATIENTS WITH ACCESS TO THEIR ELECTRONIC HEALTH
INFORMATION. THE FEDERAL ACT ALSO STATES THAT INFORMATION
BLOCKING BY HEALTH-CARE PROVIDERS, INCLUDING PHYSICIANS, IS A
PRACTICE THAT IS LIKELY TO INTERFERE WITH, PREVENT, OR MATERIALLY
DISCOURAGE THE ACCESS, EXCHANGE, OR USE OF ELECTRONIC HEALTH
-2- 162

INFORMATION.
(II) THE FEDERAL ACT ALLOWS STATES TO ESTABLISH EXCEPTIONS
TO THE FEDERAL ACT'S REQUIREMENTS;
(III) REGULATIONS IMPLEMENTING THE FEDERAL ACT REQUIRE THE
ELECTRONIC RELEASE OF ALL TEST RESULTS TO PATIENTS IMMEDIATELY,
BEFORE PATIENTS HAVE AN OPPORTUNITY TO TALK WITH THEIR PHYSICIAN
OR HEALTH-CARE PROVIDER ABOUT THE TEST RESULTS. THIS
REQUIREMENT CAN POTENTIALLY LEAD TO PATIENT CONFUSION AND
PROLONGED OR UNNECESSARY CONCERN ABOUT THE TEST RESULTS.
(IV) PATIENTS HAVE A FUNDAMENTAL RIGHT TO ACCESS THEIR
OWN HEALTH INFORMATION. HOWEVER, FEDERAL REGULATIONS DO NOT
CONTEMPLATE A BRIEF AND PURPOSEFUL DELAY IN THE RELEASE OF TEST
RESULTS TO AFFORD A PATIENT'S PHYSICIAN OR HEALTH-CARE PROVIDER
AN OPPORTUNITY TO ACCOMMODATE THE PATIENT'S PREFERENCES OR
CONTACT THE PATIENT ABOUT SENSITIVE TEST RESULTS.
(V) RULES AND STANDARDS CONCERNING COMMUNICATING WITH
PATIENTS SHOULD REFLECT THE COMPLEXITIES AND CONSEQUENCES OF
RELEASING SENSITIVE TEST RESULTS TO PATIENTS. THIS IS ESPECIALLY THE
CASE WHEN COMMUNICATING WITH A PATIENT ABOUT SENSITIVE TEST
RESULTS OR WHEN A PATIENT'S UNDERSTANDING OF SENSITIVE TEST
RESULTS MAY BENEFIT FROM A PHYSICIAN'S OR HEALTH-CARE PROVIDER'S
REVIEW OF THE RESULTS BEFORE THE RESULTS ARE RELEASED AND MADE
AVAILABLE TO THE PATIENT AS PART OF THE PATIENT'S ELECTRONIC
HEALTH RECORD OR THROUGH A PATIENT PORTAL.
(VI) IF A RADIOLOGIC TEST, GENETIC MARKER TEST, OR
PATHOLOGIC EXAM REPORT REVEALS RESULTS THAT ARE LIKELY TO BE
DISTRESSING TO OR UNEXPECTED BY THE PATIENT, THE PHYSICIAN OR
-3- 162

HEALTH-CARE PROVIDER WHO ORDERED THE TEST OR EXAM SHOULD HAVE
AN OPPORTUNITY TO REVIEW THE RESULTS BEFORE THE RESULTS ARE
RELEASED AND MADE AVAILABLE TO THE PATIENT AS PART OF THE
PATIENT'S ELECTRONIC HEALTH RECORD OR THROUGH A PATIENT PORTAL.
IN THIS WAY, THE PHYSICIAN OR HEALTH-CARE PROVIDER MAY SHARE THE
RESULTS MORE PERSONALLY WITH THE PATIENT, PROVIDE APPROPRIATE
MEDICAL GUIDANCE AND SUPPORT, ANSWER QUESTIONS ABOUT PROGNOSIS
AND TREATMENT OPTIONS, AND GATHER APPROPRIATE RESOURCES FOR
THE PATIENT.

(b) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY, THEREFORE, DECLARES THAT
PATIENTS SHOULD BE PROTECTED FROM THE RISK OF MISUNDERSTANDING
SENSITIVE TEST RESULTS WITHOUT THE BENEFIT OF THE REVIEW AND
GUIDANCE OF THE PHYSICIAN OR HEALTH-CARE PROVIDER WHO ORDERED
THE TEST OR EXAM. THERE SHOULD BE AN EXCEPTION TO THE FEDERAL
ACT'S REQUIREMENT THAT SENSITIVE TEST RESULTS BE RELEASED TO A
PATIENT IMMEDIATELY AFTER THE RESULTS ARE FINALIZED REGARDLESS
OF THE SENSITIVITY OF THE TEST RESULTS OR THE PATIENT'S WISHES.
INSTEAD, A PHYSICIAN OR HEALTH-CARE PROVIDER WHO ORDERS A TEST
OR EXAM SHOULD HAVE AN OPPORTUNITY TO REVIEW SENSITIVE TEST
RESULTS BEFORE THEY ARE RELEASED AND MADE AVAILABLE TO THE
PATIENT AS PART OF THE PATIENT'S ELECTRONIC HEALTH RECORD OR
THROUGH A PATIENT PORTAL.
(3) Definitions. AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT
OTHERWISE REQUIRES:

(a) "ELECTRONIC HEALTH RECORD" HAS THE SAME MEANING AS
-4- 162

"QUALIFIED EHR" AS DEFINED IN 45 CFR 170.102.
(b) "FEDERAL ACT" MEANS THE FEDERAL "21ST CENTURY CURES
ACT", PUB.L. 114-255, 130 STAT. 1033.
(c) "PATIENT PORTAL" MEANS A SECURE ONLINE SYSTEM THAT
PROVIDES A PATIENT WITH ELECTRONIC ACCESS TO THEIR PERSONAL
HEALTH INFORMATION AND THAT DIRECTLY LINKS TO AN ELECTRONIC
HEALTH RECORD.
(d) "SENSITIVE TEST RESULT" MEANS:
(I) A PATHOLOGY REPORT OR RADIOLOGY REPORT THAT IS
ORDERED FOR THE PURPOSE OF DIAGNOSING OR MONITORING A PATIENT
FOR CANCER; OR
(II) A TEST RESULT THAT MAY REVEAL A GENETIC MARKER THAT
RELATES TO A CANCER CONDITION.
(4) Prohibition against immediate release of sensitive test
results - exceptions.
(a) BEGINNING JULY 1, 2027, EXCEPT AS PERMITTED UNDER
SUBSECTION (4)(b) OF THIS SECTION, SENSITIVE TEST RESULTS SHALL NOT
BE RELEASED OR BE MADE AVAILABLE TO A PATIENT AS PART OF THE
PATIENT'S ELECTRONIC HEALTH RECORD OR THROUGH A PATIENT PORTAL
EARLIER THAN THREE BUSINESS DAYS AFTER THE SENSITIVE TEST RESULTS
ARE FINALIZED.
(b) SENSITIVE TEST RESULTS MAY BE RELEASED AND BE MADE
AVAILABLE TO A PATIENT AS PART OF THE PATIENT'S ELECTRONIC HEALTH
RECORD OR THROUGH A PATIENT PORTAL IMMEDIATELY AND WITHOUT
DELAY AFTER THE SENSITIVE TEST RESULTS ARE FINALIZED IF THE
PATIENT'S PHYSICIAN OR TREATING HEALTH-CARE PROVIDER AUTHORIZES
THE SENSITIVE TEST RESULTS TO BE RELEASED BEFORE THE END OF THE
-5- 162

THREE-BUSINESS-DAY PERIOD.

(c) A PERSON THAT ADMINISTERS AND CONTROLS A PATIENT'S
ELECTRONIC HEALTH RECORD SHALL IMPLEMENT THIS SUBSECTION (4).
(d) COMPLIANCE WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION IS NOT
INFORMATION BLOCKING UNDER 42 U.S.C. SEC. 300jj-52.
(e) A PERSON IS NOT SUBJECT TO CIVIL, CRIMINAL, OR
ADMINISTRATIVE LIABILITY OR PROFESSIONAL DISCIPLINARY ACTION FOR
FAILING TO COMPLY WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the
state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act
within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect
unless approved by the people at the general election to be held in
November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
-6- 162